Washington statutes.
RCW 19.28.381

Denial of renewal of certificate or license for outstanding penalties—Notice—Appeal—Hearing.

The department may deny renewal of a certificate or license issued under this chapter, if the applicant for renewal owes outstanding penalties for a final judgment under this chapter. The department shall notify the applicant of the denial by registered mail, return receipt requested, to the address on the application. The applicant may appeal the denial within twenty days by filing a notice of appeal with the department accompanied by a certified check for two hundred dollars or ten percent of the amount of the outstanding penalties, whichever is less, but in no event less than one hundred dollars. The check shall be returned to the applicant if the decision of the department is not upheld by the board. The office of administrative hearings shall conduct the hearing under chapter 34.05 RCW. The electrical board shall review the proposed decision at the next regularly scheduled board meeting. If the board sustains the decision of the department, the amount of the check must be applied to the cost of the hearing.

[ 2014 c 190 s 3; 1996 c 241 s 1. Formerly RCW 19.28.630.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2014 c 190: See note following RCW 19.28.131.